District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.13

District repayment option.

(a)

The District retains the right to direct the Authority to purchase its own bonds and notes, subject to the terms and conditions of § 34-2202.10(h), for the purpose of dissolving or altering the Authority after such bonds and notes are cancelled or defeased.

(b)

The District further retains the right to direct the Authority to defease bonds, and the authority shall do so, conditioned upon the District providing moneys, which together with the moneys of the Authority available for defeasance, would be sufficient to satisfy the requirements of § 34-2202.13a(a)(1).

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 213, 43 DCR 548
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-184, § 202(j), 43 DCR 4265
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(j) of the Water and Sewer Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-397, October 9, 1996, 43 DCR 5686), § 2(j) of the Water and Sewer Authority Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-466, December 30, 1996, 44 DCR 165), and § 2(j) of the Water and Sewer Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-48, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2105).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(j) of the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-293, July 9, 1996, 43 DCR 4160).
1981 Ed., § 43-1683.
This section is referenced in § 34-2202.07.